California statutes. Vehicle Code
(3) Upon a conviction under this subdivision of an offense that occurred within five years of two or more prior offenses resulting in convictions of offenses under this subdivision, by a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000). The person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 13355.

(c) A vehicle subject to Section 22406 shall be driven in a lane designated pursuant to Section 21655, or if a lane has not been so designated, in the right-hand lane for traffic or as close as practicable to the right-hand edge or curb. When overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction, the driver shall use either the designated lane, the lane to the immediate left of the right-hand lane, or the right-hand lane for traffic as permitted under this code. If, however, specific lane or lanes have not been designated on a divided highway having four or more clearly marked lanes for traffic in one direction, a vehicle may also be driven in the lane to the immediate left of the right-hand lane, unless otherwise prohibited under this code. This subdivision does not apply to a driver who is preparing for a left- or right-hand turn or who is in the process of entering into or exiting from a highway or to a driver who is required necessarily to drive in a lane other than the right-hand lane to continue on his or her intended route.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 300, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

22349.

(a) Except as provided in Section 22356, no person may drive a vehicle upon a highway at a speed greater than 65 miles per hour.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no person may drive a vehicle upon a two-lane, undivided highway at a speed greater than 55 miles per hour unless that highway, or portion thereof, has been posted for a higher speed by the Department of Transportation or appropriate local agency upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey. For purposes of this subdivision, the following apply:

(1) A two-lane, undivided highway is a highway with not more than one through lane of travel in each direction.

(2) Passing lanes may not be considered when determining the number of through lanes.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that there be reasonable signing on affected two-lane, undivided highways described in subdivision (b) in continuing the 55 miles-per-hour speed limit, including placing signs at county boundaries to the extent possible, and at other appropriate locations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22350.

No person shall drive a vehicle upon a highway at a speed greater than is reasonable or prudent having due regard for weather, visibility, the traffic on, and the surface and width of, the highway, and in no event at a speed which endangers the safety of persons or property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 252.)
-------------------------------------------

22351.

(a) The speed of any vehicle upon a highway not in excess of the limits specified in Section 22352 or established as authorized in this code is lawful unless clearly proved to be in violation of the basic speed law.

(b) The speed of any vehicle upon a highway in excess of the prima facie speed limits in Section 22352 or established as authorized in this code is prima facie unlawful unless the defendant establishes by competent evidence that the speed in excess of said limits did not constitute a violation of the basic speed law at the time, place and under the conditions then existing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

22352.

The prima facie limits are as follows and shall be applicable unless changed as authorized in this code and, if so changed, only when signs have been erected giving notice thereof:

(a) Fifteen miles per hour:

(1) When traversing a railway grade crossing, if, during the last 100 feet of the approach to the crossing, the driver does not have a clear and unobstructed view of the crossing and of any traffic on the railway for a distance of 400 feet in both directions along the railway. This paragraph does not apply in the case of any railway grade crossing where a human flagperson is on duty or a clearly visible electrical or mechanical railway
 crossing signal device is installed but does not then indicate the immediate approach of a railway train or car.

(2) When traversing any intersection of highways, if, during the last 100 feet of the driver’s approach to the intersection, the driver does not have a clear and unobstructed view of the intersection and of any traffic upon all of the highways entering the intersection for a distance of 100 feet along all those highways, except at an intersection protected by stop signs or yield right-of-way signs or controlled by official traffic control signals.

(3) On any alley.

(b) Twenty-five miles per hour:

(1) On any highway in any business or residence district
 unless a different speed is determined by local authority or the Department of Transportation under procedures set forth in this code.

(2) When approaching or passing a school building or the grounds thereof, contiguous to a highway and posted with a standard “SCHOOL” warning sign, while children are going to or leaving the school either during school hours or during the noon recess period. The prima facie limit shall also apply when approaching or passing any school grounds which are not separated from the highway by a fence, gate, or other physical barrier while the grounds are in use by children and the highway is posted with a standard “SCHOOL” warning sign. For purposes of this subparagraph, standard “SCHOOL” warning signs may be placed at any distance up to 500 feet away from school grounds.

(3) When passing a senior center or other facility primarily used by senior citizens, contiguous to a street other than a state highway and posted with a standard “SENIOR” warning sign. A local authority may erect a sign pursuant to this paragraph when the local agency makes a determination that the proposed signing should be implemented. A local authority may request grant funding from the Active Transportation Program pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code, or any other grant funding available to it, and use that grant funding to pay for the erection of those signs, or may utilize any other funds available to it to pay for the erection of those signs, including, but not limited to, donations from private sources.

(c) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 555, Sec. 1.   (AB 382)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   See later operative version as added by Sec. 2 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 555.)
-------------------------------------------

22352.

The prima facie limits are as follows and shall be applicable unless changed as authorized in this code and, if so changed, only when signs have been erected giving notice thereof:

(a) Fifteen miles per hour:

(1) When traversing a railway grade crossing, if, during the last 100 feet of the approach to the crossing, the driver does not have a clear and unobstructed view of the crossing and of any traffic on the railway for a distance of 400 feet in both directions along the railway. This paragraph does not apply in the case of any railway grade crossing where a human flagperson is on duty or a clearly visible electrical or mechanical railway
 crossing signal device is installed but does not then indicate the immediate approach of a railway train or car.

(2) When traversing any intersection of highways, if, during the last 100 feet of the driver’s approach to the intersection, the driver does not have a clear and unobstructed view of the intersection and of any traffic upon all of the highways entering the intersection for a distance of 100 feet along all those highways, except at an intersection protected by stop signs or yield right-of-way signs or controlled by official traffic control signals.

(3) On any alley.

(b) Twenty miles per hour in a school zone when any of the following apply:

(1) A school speed limit sign with attached beacons states “speed limit 20 when flashing” and the beacons are flashing.

(2) A school speed limit sign states “children are present” and children are present.

(3) A school speed limit sign with specific hours, which shall be determined by the local jurisdiction.

(c) Twenty-five miles per hour:

(1) On any highway in any business or residence district unless a different speed is determined by local authority or the Department of Transportation under procedures set forth in this code.

(2) When passing a senior center or other facility primarily used by
 senior citizens, contiguous to a street other than a state highway and posted with a standard “SENIOR” warning sign. A local authority may erect a sign pursuant to this paragraph when the local agency makes a determination that the proposed signing should be implemented. A local authority may request grant funding from the Active Transportation Program pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of Division 3 of the Streets and Highways Code, or any other grant funding available to it, and use that grant funding to pay for the erection of those
 signs, or may utilize any other funds available to it to pay for the erection of those signs, including, but not limited to, donations from private sources.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “School zone” means an area of a highway within 500 feet of school grounds in any direction, unless otherwise posted, marked with appropriate signs giving notice of the area.

(2) (A) “Children are present” means whenever either of the following occurs:

(i) Children are going to or leaving the school.

(ii) School grounds are in
 use by children and the highway is posted with a standard “SCHOOL” warning sign.

(B) “Children are present” does not include children who are separated from the highway by a fence, gate, or other physical barrier.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2031.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 555, Sec. 2.   (AB 382)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22352.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 22352, a local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 20 miles per hour in a school zone.

(b) For purposes of this section, “school zone” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22352.

(c) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 555, Sec. 3.   (AB 382)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.

When conducting an engineering and traffic survey, the City of Norco, in addition to the factors set forth in Section 627, may also consider equestrian safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.2.

The City of Burbank may also consider equestrian safety when conducting an engineering and traffic survey of the public streets within the boundaries of the Rancho Master Plan Area in the City of Burbank, as described in the City of Burbank’s General Plan adopted on February 19, 2013, in addition to the factors set forth in Section 627.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.   (AB 2955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.3.

The City of Glendale may also consider equestrian safety when conducting an engineering and traffic survey of the public streets within the boundaries of the Horse Overlay Zone, commonly known as the Riverside Rancho Area, in the City of Glendale, as described in Chapter 30.21 of the Glendale Municipal Code, in addition to the factors set forth in Section 627.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 398, Sec. 2.   (AB 2955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.4.

The City of Los Angeles may also consider equestrian safety when conducting an engineering and traffic survey of the public streets within the boundaries of the Sylmar Community Plan Area and the Sunland-Tujunga-Lake View Terrace-Shadow Hills-East La Tuna Canyon Community Plan Area in the City of Los Angeles, as described in the Sylmar Community Plan adopted on June 10, 2015, and the Sunland-Tujunga-Lake View Terrace-Shadow Hills-East La Tuna Canyon Community Plan Update adopted on November 18, 1997, respectively, in addition to the factors set forth in Section 627.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 398, Sec. 3.   (AB 2955)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22353.5.

When conducting an engineering and traffic survey of the public streets within the boundaries of the common interest development known as Orange Park Acres, in addition to the factors set forth in Section 627, the County of Orange may also consider equestrian safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 282, Sec. 1.   (AB 1669)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

22354.

(a) Whenever the Department of Transportation determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the limit of 65 miles per hour is more than is reasonable or safe upon any portion of a state highway where the limit of 65 miles is applicable, the department may determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 60, 55, 50, 45, 40, 35, 30, 25, 20, or 15 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate to facilitate the orderly movement of traffic and is reasonable and safe, which declared prima facie speed limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the highway.

(b) This section shall
 become operative on the date specified in subdivision (c) of Section 22366.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 690, Sec. 4.   (AB 43)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22354.5.

(a) Whenever the Department of Transportation determines, upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey, to increase or decrease the existing speed limit on a particular portion of a state highway pursuant to Section 22354, it shall, prior to increasing or decreasing that speed limit, consult with, and take into consideration the recommendations of, the Department of the California Highway Patrol. 

(b) The city council or board of supervisors of a city or county through which any portion of a state highway subject to subdivision (a) extends may conduct a public hearing on the proposed increase or decrease at a convenient location as near as possible to that portion of state highway. The Department of Transportation shall take into consideration the results of the public hearing in determining whether to increase or decrease the speed limit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 219, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22355.

Whenever the Department of Transportation determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the safe and orderly movement of traffic upon any state highway which is a freeway will be facilitated by the establishment of variable speed limits, the department may erect, regulate, and control signs upon the state highway which is a freeway, or any portion thereof, which signs shall be so designed as to permit display of different speed limits at various times of the day or night. Such signs need not conform to the standards and specifications established by regulations of the Department of Transportation pursuant to Section 21400, but shall be of sufficient size and clarity to give adequate notice of the applicable speed limit. The speed limit upon the freeway at a particular time and place shall be that which is then and there displayed upon such sign.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

22356.

(a) Whenever the Department of Transportation, after consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey on existing highway segments, or upon the basis of appropriate design standards and projected traffic volumes in the case of newly constructed highway segments, that a speed greater than 65 miles per hour would facilitate the orderly movement of vehicular traffic and would be reasonable and safe upon any state highway, or portion thereof, that is otherwise subject to a maximum speed limit of 65 miles per hour, the Department of Transportation, with the approval of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, may declare a higher maximum speed of 70 miles per hour for vehicles not subject to Section 22406, and shall cause appropriate signs to be erected giving notice thereof. The Department of Transportation shall only make a determination under this section that is fully consistent with, and in full compliance with, federal law.

(b) No person shall drive a vehicle upon that highway at a speed greater than 70 miles per hour, as posted.

(c) This section shall become operative on the date specified in subdivision (c) of Section 22366.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 26) and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 1996.   This section became operative, by its own provisions, on the date described in Section 22366.)
-------------------------------------------

22357.

(a) Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that a speed greater than 25 miles per hour would facilitate the orderly movement of vehicular traffic and would be reasonable and safe upon any street other than a state highway otherwise subject to a prima facie limit of 25 miles per hour, the local authority may by ordinance determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 30, 35, 40, 45, 50, 55, or 60 miles per hour or a maximum speed limit of 65 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate to facilitate the orderly movement of traffic and is reasonable and safe. The declared prima facie or maximum speed limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street and shall not thereafter be revised except upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey. This section does not apply to any 25-mile-per-hour prima facie limit which is applicable when passing a school building or the grounds thereof or when passing a senior center or other facility primarily used by senior citizens.

(b) This section shall become operative on the date specified in subdivision (c) of Section 22366.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 28) and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 1996.   This section became operative, by its own provisions, on the date described in Section 22366.)
-------------------------------------------

22357.1.

Notwithstanding Section 22357, a local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, set a prima facie speed limit of 25 miles per hour on any street, other than a state highway, adjacent to any children’s playground in a public park but only during particular hours or days when children are expected to use the facilities. The 25 mile per hour speed limit shall be effective when signs giving notice of the speed limit are posted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 508, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.

(a) Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the limit of 65 miles per hour is more than is reasonable or safe upon any portion of any street other than a state highway where the limit of 65 miles per hour is applicable, the local authority may by ordinance determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 60, 55, 50, 45, 40, 35, 30, 25, 20, or 15 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate to facilitate the orderly movement of traffic and is reasonable and safe, which declared prima facie limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street.

(b) This
 section shall become operative on the date specified in subdivision (c) of Section 22366.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 690, Sec. 5.   (AB 43)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.3.

Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the prima facie speed limit of 25 miles per hour in a business or residence district or in a public park on any street having a roadway not exceeding 25 feet in width, other than a state highway, is more than is reasonable or safe, the local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 20 or 15 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate and is reasonable and safe. The declared prima facie limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1095.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.4.

(a) (1) Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the prima facie speed limit established by subdivision (b) of Section 22352 is more than is reasonable or safe, the local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 15 miles per hour if justified as the appropriate speed limit by that survey.

(2) An ordinance or resolution adopted under paragraph (1) shall not be effective until appropriate signs giving notice of the speed limit are erected upon the highway and, in the case of a state highway, until the ordinance is approved by the Department of Transportation
 and the appropriate signs are erected upon the highway.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other provision of law, a local authority may, by ordinance or resolution, determine and declare prima facie speed limits as follows:

(A) A 15 miles per hour prima facie limit in a residence district, on a highway with a posted speed limit of 30 miles per hour or slower, in a school zone.

(B) A 25 miles per hour prima facie limit on a highway when approaching, at a distance of 500 to 1,000 feet from, a school zone.

(2) The prima facie limit established under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) applies only to highways that meet all of the following
 conditions:

(A) A maximum of two traffic lanes.

(B) A maximum posted 30 miles per hour prima facie speed limit immediately prior to and after the school zone.

(3) The prima facie limits established under paragraph (1) apply to all lanes of an affected highway, in both directions of travel.

(4) When determining the need to lower the prima facie speed limit, the local authority shall take the provisions of Section 627 into consideration.

(5) (A) An ordinance or resolution adopted under paragraph (1) shall not be effective until appropriate signs giving notice of the speed limit are
 erected upon the highway and, in the case of a state highway, until the ordinance is approved by the Department of Transportation and the appropriate signs are erected upon the highway.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), school warning signs indicating a speed limit of 15 miles per hour may be placed at a distance up to 500 feet away from school grounds.

(C) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), school warning signs indicating a speed limit of 25 miles per hour may be placed at any distance between 500 and 1,000 feet away from the school grounds.

(D) A local authority shall reimburse the Department of Transportation for all costs incurred by the department under this subdivision.

(c) For purposes of this section, “school zone” has the same meaning as defined in Section 22352.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 555, Sec. 4.   (AB 382)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that physical conditions such as width, curvature, grade and surface conditions, or any other condition readily apparent to a driver, in the absence of other factors, would not require special downward speed zoning, as the basic rule of section 22350 is sufficient regulation as to such conditions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.6.

(a) The Department of Transportation shall, in the next scheduled revision, revise and thereafter maintain the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices to require the Department of Transportation or a local authority to round speed limits to the nearest five miles per hour of the 85th percentile of the free-flowing traffic.

(b) In cases in which the speed limit needs to be rounded down to the nearest five miles per hour increment of the 85th-percentile speed, the Department of Transportation or a local authority may lower the speed limit by five miles per hour from the nearest
 five-mile-per-hour increment of the 85th-percentile speed, in compliance with Sections 627 and 22358.5 and the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, as it read on March 30, 2021, if the reasons for the lower speed limit are documented in an engineering and traffic survey. The Department of Transportation or a local authority may also take into consideration Sections 22353, 22353.2, 22353.3, 22353.4, and 22353.5, if applicable.

(c) In cases in which the speed limit needs to be rounded up to the nearest five-mile-per-hour increment of the 85th-percentile speed, the Department of Transportation or a local authority may decide to instead round down the speed limit to the lower five-mile-per-hour increment. If the speed limit is rounded down pursuant to this subdivision, the speed limit shall not be reduced
 any further pursuant to subdivision (b).

(d) In addition to subdivisions (b) and (c), the Department of Transportation or a local authority may additionally lower the speed limit as provided in Section 22358.7.

(e) The total reduction in the speed limit pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive, shall not exceed 12.4 miles per hour from the 85th-percentile speed.

(f) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) to (e), inclusive, the Department of Transportation or a local authority may retain the currently adopted speed limit as provided in
 Section 22358.8 without further reduction, or restore the immediately prior adopted speed limit as provided in Section 22358.8 without further reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 287, Sec. 2.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.7.

(a) If the Department of Transportation or a local authority, after completing an engineering and traffic survey, finds that the speed limit is still more than is reasonable or safe, the Department of Transportation may or the local authority may, by ordinance, determine and declare a prima facie speed limit that has been reduced an additional five miles per hour for either or both of the
 following reasons:

(1) The portion of highway has been designated as a safety corridor. The Department of Transportation or a local authority shall not deem more than one-fifth of their streets as safety corridors.

(2) The portion of highway is adjacent to any land or facility that generates high concentrations of bicyclists or pedestrians, especially those from vulnerable groups such as children, seniors, persons with disabilities, and the unhoused.

(b) (1) As used in this section, “safety corridor” shall be defined by the Department of Transportation in the next revision of the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices. In making this determination, the Department of Transportation shall consider highways that have the highest number of serious injuries and fatalities based on collision data that may be derived from, but not limited to, the Statewide Integrated Traffic Records System.

(2) The
 Department of Transportation shall, in the next revision of the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, determine what constitutes land or facilities that generate high concentrations of bicyclists and pedestrians, as used in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a). In making this determination, the Department of Transportation shall consider density, road use type, and bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure present on a section of highway.

(c) A peace officer shall issue only warning citations for violations of exceeding the speed limit by 10 miles per hour or less for the first 30 days that a lower speed limit is in effect as authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.8.

(a) If the Department of Transportation or a local authority, after completing an engineering and traffic survey, finds that the speed limit is still more than is reasonable or safe, the Department of Transportation may or the local authority may, by ordinance, retain the currently adopted speed limit or restore the immediately prior adopted speed limit on a highway that is not a freeway if that speed limit was established with an engineering and traffic survey and if a registered engineer has evaluated the
 section of highway and determined that no additional general purpose lanes have been added to the roadway since completion of the traffic survey that established that speed limit.

(b) This section does not authorize a speed limit to be reduced by any more than five miles per hour from the currently adopted speed limit nor below the immediately prior speed limit.

(c) A peace officer shall issue only warning citations for violations of exceeding the speed limit by 10 miles per hour or less for the first 30 days that a lower speed limit is in effect as authorized by this
 section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 287, Sec. 4.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22358.9.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Transportation may or a local authority may, by ordinance, determine and declare a 25- or 20-mile-per-hour prima facie speed limit on a highway that is not a freeway and that is contiguous to a business activity district when posted with a sign that indicates a speed limit of 25 or 20 miles per hour.

(2) The prima facie limits established under paragraph (1) apply only to highways that meet all of the following conditions:

(A) A maximum of four traffic lanes.

(B) A maximum posted
 30-mile-per-hour prima facie speed limit immediately prior to and after the business activity district, if establishing a 25-mile-per-hour speed limit.

(C) A maximum posted 25-mile-per-hour prima facie speed limit immediately prior to and after the business activity district, if establishing a 20-mile-per-hour speed limit.

(b) As used in this section, a “business activity district” is that portion of a highway and the property contiguous thereto that includes central or neighborhood downtowns, urban villages, or zoning designations that prioritize commercial land uses at the downtown or neighborhood scale and meets at least three of the following requirements in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive:

(1) No
 less than 50 percent of the contiguous property fronting the highway consists of retail or dining commercial uses, including outdoor dining, that open directly onto sidewalks adjacent to the highway.

(2) Parking, including parallel, diagonal, or perpendicular spaces located alongside the highway.

(3) Traffic control signals or stop signs regulating traffic flow on the highway, located at intervals of no more than 600 feet.

(4) Marked crosswalks not controlled by a traffic control device.

(c) The Department of Transportation or a local authority shall not declare a prima facie speed limit under this section on a portion of a highway where the Department of Transportation
 or the local authority has already lowered the speed limit as permitted under Section 22358.7, has retained the currently adopted speed limit under Section 22358.8, or has restored the immediately prior adopted speed limit under Section 22358.8.

(d) A peace officer shall issue only warning citations for violations of exceeding the speed limit by 10 miles per hour or less for the first 30 days that a lower speed limit is in effect as authorized by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 287, Sec. 5.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22359.

With respect to boundary line streets and highways where portions thereof are within different jurisdictions, no ordinance adopted under Sections 22357 and 22358 shall be effective as to any such portion until all authorities having jurisdiction of the portions of the street concerned have approved the same. This section shall not apply in the case of boundary line streets consisting of separate roadways within different jurisdictions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

22360.

(a) Whenever a local authority determines upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey that the limit of 65 miles per hour is more than is reasonable or safe upon any portion of a highway other than a state highway for a distance of not exceeding 2,000 feet in length between districts, either business or residence, the local authority may determine and declare a reasonable and safe prima facie limit thereon lower than 65 miles per hour, but not less than 25 miles per hour, which declared prima facie speed limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected upon the street or highway.

(b) This section shall become operative on the date specified in subdivision (c) of Section 22366.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 32) and added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1996.   This section became operative, by its own provisions, on the date described in Section 22366.)
-------------------------------------------

22361.

On multiple-lane highways with two or more separate roadways different prima facie speed limits may be established for different roadways under any of the procedures specified in Sections 22354 to 22359, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

22362.

It is prima facie a violation of the basic speed law for any person to operate a vehicle in excess of the posted speed limit upon any portion of a highway where officers or employees of the agency having jurisdiction of the same, or any contractor of the agency or his employees, are at work on the roadway or within the right-of-way so close thereto as to be endangered by passing traffic. This section applies only when appropriate signs, indicating the limits of the restricted zone, and the speed limit applicable therein, are placed by such agency within 400 feet of each end of such zone. The signs shall display the figures indicating the applicable limit, which shall not be less than 25 miles per hour, and shall indicate the purpose of the speed restriction. Nothing in this section shall be deemed to relieve any operator of a vehicle from complying with the basic speed law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 515.)
-------------------------------------------

22363.

Notwithstanding any speed limit that may be in effect upon the highway, the Department of Transportation in respect to state highways, or a local authority with respect to highways under its jurisdiction, may determine and declare a prima facie speed limit of 40, 35, 30, or 25 miles per hour, whichever is found most appropriate and is reasonable and safe based on the prevailing snow or ice conditions upon such highway or any portion thereof. Signs may be placed and removed as snow or ice conditions vary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

22364.

Whenever the Department of Transportation determines, upon the basis of an engineering and traffic survey, that the safe and orderly movement of traffic upon any state highway will be facilitated by the establishment of different speed limits for the various lanes of traffic, the department may place signs upon the state highway, or any portion thereof. The signs shall designate the speed limits for each of the lanes of traffic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 84.)
-------------------------------------------

22365.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any county or city, which is contained, in whole or in part, within the South Coast Air Quality Management District, may, if the county or city determines that it is necessary to achieve or maintain state or federal ambient air quality standards for particulate matter, determine and declare by ordinance a prima facie speed limit that is lower than that which the county or city is otherwise permitted by this code to establish, for any unpaved road under the jurisdiction of the county or city and within the district. That declared prima facie speed limit shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected along the road.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 16, Sec. 1.   Effective May 30, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

22366.

(a) Whenever the Director of Transportation determines the date upon which the state may establish a maximum speed limit of 65 miles per hour on highways without subjecting the state to a reduction in the amount of federal aid for highways, the director shall notify the Secretary of State of that determination.

(b) The notice required under subdivision (a) shall state that it is being made pursuant to this section.

(c) The notice shall specify a date which is either the date determined pursuant to subdivision (a), or a later date designated by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 766, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Other Speed Laws [22400. - 22413.]

22400.

(a) No person shall drive upon a highway at such a slow speed as to impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic unless the reduced speed is necessary for safe operation, because of a grade, or in compliance with law.

No person shall bring a vehicle to a complete stop upon a highway so as to impede or block the normal and reasonable movement of traffic unless the stop is necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law.

(b) Whenever the Department of Transportation determines on the basis of an engineering and traffic survey
 that slow speeds on any part of a state highway consistently impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic, the department may determine and declare a minimum speed limit below which no person shall drive a vehicle, except when necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law, when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected along the part of the highway for which a minimum speed limit is established.

Subdivision (b) of this section shall apply only to vehicles subject to registration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

22401.
